Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5515XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5515XD (1) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 11.41, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
3. If the information, records, instrumentalities, and
properties sought by the auditor of state are required by law
to be kept confidential, the auditor of state shall have access
to the information, records, instrumentalities, and properties,
but shall maintain the confidentiality of all such information
and is subject to the same penalties as the lawful custodian
of the information for dissemination of the information.
However, the auditor of state shall not have access to the
income tax returns of individuals or information in a report to
the department of health and human services, to a local board
of health, or to a local health department that identifies a
person infected with a reportable disease to an individual’s
name or residential address from a reportable disease report
under section 139A.3.
Sec. 2. Section 11.41, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 3. Section 11.42, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
3. Upon completion of an audit or examination, a report
shall be prepared as required by section 11.28 and all
information included in the report shall be public information.
The auditor shall not disclose information listed in section
11.41, subsection 4, paragraph “a”, in a report without the
express written consent of the individual identified, or, in
instances of alleged or suspected embezzlement, theft, or other
significant financial irregularity, without the express written
consent of the audited or examined entity.
Sec. 4. Section 11.52, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
11.52 Refusal to testify.
Except as otherwise provided in section 679A.19, in In case
any witness duly subpoenaed refuses to attend, or refuses to
produce documents, books, and papers, or attends and refuses to
LSB 5515XD (1) 91
-1- ss/ns 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
make oath or affirmation, or, being sworn or affirmed, refuses
to testify, the auditor of state or the auditor’s designee may
apply to the district court, or any judge of said district
having jurisdiction thereof, for the enforcement of attendance
and answers to questions as provided by law in the matter of
taking depositions.
Sec. 5. Section 679A.19, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
679A.19 Disputes between governmental agencies.
1. Any litigation between constitutional and statutory
offices, administrative departments, commissions, or boards of
the executive branch of state government is prohibited. All
disputes between said governmental offices and agencies shall
be submitted to a board of arbitration of three members to
be composed of two members to be appointed by the offices or
departments involved in the dispute and a third member to be
appointed by the governor. The decision of the board shall be
final.
2. A board of arbitration established under this section
shall resolve any dispute submitted to it within sixty days
after submission of the dispute.
Sec. 6. REPEAL. Section 11.3, Code 2026, is repealed.